Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1301.01
County clerk; deputy; appointment; oath; duties.

The county clerk may appoint a deputy for whose acts he or she will be responsible. The clerk may not appoint the county treasurer, sheriff, register of deeds, or surveyor as deputy.

The appointment shall be in writing and revocable in writing by the clerk. Both the appointment and revocation shall be filed and kept in the office of the clerk.

The deputy shall take the same oath as the clerk which shall be endorsed upon and filed with the certificate of appointment. The clerk may require a bond of the deputy.

In the absence or disability of the clerk, the deputy shall perform the duties of the clerk pertaining to the office, but when the clerk is required to act in conjunction with or in place of another officer, the deputy cannot act in the clerk's place.

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 3.